Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-114 Insured's obligations upon
termination of insurance. An owner of a motor vehicle registered in this
State who fails to maintain insurance as required by section 431:10C-104 shall:

(1) Immediately surrender the registration
certificate and license plates for the vehicle to the county director of
finance; and

(2) Not operate or permit operation of the vehicle in
this State until insurance has again been obtained. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next